District of Columbia statutes.
16-1368

Additional powers of court.

Where the mode or manner of conducting a proceeding pursuant to this subchapter is not expressly provided for by law or rules of court in force under authority of law, the court may make all necessary orders and give all necessary directions to carry into effect the object and intent of this subchapter or any other laws conferring authority to acquire real property for the use of the United States.

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 581, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1
Eminent domain, jurisdiction, District Court, see § 16-1301.
1981 Ed., § 16-1368.
1973 Ed., § 16-1368.